Washington statutes.
RCW 28A.657.010

Definitions.

The definitions in this section apply throughout this chapter unless the context clearly requires otherwise.

(1) "All students group" means those students in grades three through eight and high school who take the state's assessment in reading or English language arts and mathematics required under 20 U.S.C. Sec. 6311(b)(3).

(2) "Title I" means Title I, part A of the federal elementary and secondary education act of 1965 (ESEA) (20 U.S.C. Secs. 6311-6322).

(3) "Turnaround principles" include but are not limited to the following:

(a) Providing strong leadership;

(b) Ensuring teachers are effective and able to improve instruction;

(c) Increasing learning time;

(d) Strengthening the school's instructional program;

(e) Using data to inform instruction;

(f) Establishing a safe and supportive school environment; and

(g) Engaging families and communities.

[ 2013 c 159 s 2; 2010 c 235 s 112.]

NOTES:

Finding—2010 c 235: See note following RCW 28A.405.245.